Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1076
Injunction without notice; showing and counter-showing; affidavits.

If the application be made upon affidavits on the part of the defendant, but not otherwise, the plaintiff may oppose the same by affidavits or other evidence, in addition to that on which the injunction was granted.

R.S.1867, Code § 264, p. 437;

R.S.1913, § 7805;

C.S.1922, § 8749;

C.S.1929, § 20-1076;

R.S.1943, § 25-1076.

Plaintiff should be allowed reasonable time to procure counter affidavits. Armstrong v. Sweeney, 65 Neb. 676, 91 N.W. 570 (1902).